Utah statutes.
41-6a-208.   Regulatory powers of local highway authorities -- Traffic-
control device affecting state highway -- Necessity of erecting traffic-
control devices.
(1)  The provisions of this chapter do not prevent a local highway authority
for a highway under its jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of
police power, from:
(a)  regulating or prohibiting stopping, standing, or parking;
(b)  regulating traffic by means of a peace officer or a traffic-control
device;
(c)  regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on a highway;
(d)  designating particular highways or roadways for use by traffic moving in
one direction under Section 41-6a-709;
(e)  establishing speed limits for vehicles in public parks, which supersede
Section 41-6a-603 regarding speed limits;
(f)  designating any highway as a through highway or designating any
intersection or junction of roadways as a stop or yield intersection or
junction;
(g)  restricting the use of a highway under Section 72-7-408;
(h)  regulating the operation of a bicycle and requiring the registration and
inspection of bicycles, including requiring a registration fee;
(i)  regulating or prohibiting:
(i)  certain turn movements of a vehicle; or
(ii)  specified types of vehicles;
(j)  altering or establishing speed limits under Section 41-6a-603;
(k)  requiring written accident reports under Section 41-6a-403;
(l)  designating no-passing zones under Section 41-6a-708;
(m)  prohibiting or regulating the use of controlled-access highways by any
class or kind of traffic under Section 41-6a-715;
(n)  prohibiting or regulating the use of heavily traveled streets by any
class or kind of traffic found to be incompatible with the normal and safe
movement of traffic;
(o)  establishing minimum speed limits under Subsection 41-6a-605(3);
(p)  prohibiting pedestrians from crossing a highway in a business district or
any designated highway except in a crosswalk under Section 41-6a-1001;
(q)  restricting pedestrian crossings at unmarked crosswalks under Section
41-6a-1010;
(r)  regulating persons upon skates, coasters, sleds, skateboards, and other
toy vehicles;
(s)  adopting and enforcing temporary or experimental ordinances as necessary
to cover emergencies or special conditions;
(t)  prohibiting drivers of ambulances from exceeding maximum speed limits; or
(u)  adopting other traffic ordinances as specifically authorized by this
chapter.
(2)  A local highway authority may not:
(a)  in accordance with Title 72, Chapter 3, Part 1, Highways in General,
erect or maintain any official traffic-control device at any location which
regulates the traffic on a highway not under the local highway authority's
jurisdiction, unless written approval is obtained from the highway authority
having jurisdiction over the highway; or
(b)  prohibit or restrict the use of a cellular phone by the operator or
passenger of a motor vehicle.
(3)  An ordinance enacted under Subsection (1)(d), (e), (f), (g), (i), (j),
(l), (m), (n), or (q) is not effective until official traffic-control devices
giving notice of the local traffic ordinances are erected upon or at the
entrances to the highway or part of it affected as is appropriate.
